Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF197.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 1928YH (4) 91 jm/md H.F. 197 Section 1. Section 331.424, subsection 1, paragraph a, Code 1 2025, is amended by adding the following new subparagraph: 2 NEW SUBPARAGRAPH . (10) The maintenance and operation of 3 a county commission of veteran affairs, including providing 4 services to veterans. 5